New York, session 2025-2026, S9679.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The private housing finance law is amended by adding a new 2 article 33 to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE XXXIII 4 BLOCK BY BLOCK HOMEOWNERSHIP PROGRAM 5 Section 1300. Legislative purpose. 6 1301. Block by block homeownership program. 7 § 1300. Legislative purpose. It is hereby declared and found that 8 there exists across upstate New York, and particularly in the cities of 9 Buffalo, Rochester, Syracuse, Albany, and Binghamton, a shortage of 10 affordable housing units available for purchase. It is further found 11 that homeownership is essential for building generational wealth, and 12 that the state therefore has an interest in promoting homeownership. In 13 order, further, to promote homeownership, it is hereby declared that 14 additional provisions should be made to provide public monies for the 15 purposes of constructing, preserving, and rehabilitating one- to two-fa- 16 mily dwellings on underutilized land throughout the state, with an 17 emphasis on the cities of Buffalo, Rochester, Syracuse, Albany, and 18 Binghamton for purchase by low and moderate income buyers. The necessi- 19 ty in the public interest for the provisions of this article is hereby 20 declared as a matter of legislative determination. 21 § 1301. Block by block homeownership program. 1. The division of 22 housing and community renewal shall, subject to appropriation, develop a 23 program to make capital subsidies available for the purpose of 24 constructing, preserving, and rehabilitating one- to two-family dwell- 25 ings outside of a city with a population of one million or more. The 26 commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations sufficient for the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02989-04-6 S. 9679 2 1 creation of a new program for the purpose of constructing, preserving, 2 and rehabilitating such one- to two-family dwellings. 3 2. Funding for the program created pursuant to this article shall, to 4 the extent practicable, be prioritized in the cities of Buffalo, Roches- 5 ter, Syracuse, Albany, and Binghamton for development on vacant, aban- 6 doned, or underutilized land owned by the municipality. 7 3. Dwellings created pursuant to this program shall be sold to a not- 8 for-profit corporation for the purpose of resale or individuals or fami- 9 lies who are low or moderate income, as determined by the division of 10 housing and community renewal, at the time of sale, who own no other 11 real property, and who intend to use the dwelling as their primary resi- 12 dence. 13 4. The division of housing and community renewal shall restrict any 14 subsequent deed of sale to an individual or family of low or moderate 15 income, as determined by the division of housing and community renewal, 16 who intends to make the dwelling their primary residence. 17 5. Nothing in this article shall preclude the use of additional loans 18 or grants in conjunction with this program. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.